nl: Hengel butt stijl: Gebogen achterstuk; Gekromd achterstuk; Afneembaar achterstuk; Lang gebogen achterstuk; Kort gebogen achterstuk; Glad achterstuk; Recht achterstuk; Unibutt; Overige
da: Stangende-stil: Bøjet håndtag; Krumt bundstykke; Aftageligt bundstykke; Langt bøjet bundstykke; Kort bøjet bundstykke; Glat bundstykke; Lige bundstykke; Unibutt; Andet
pl: Styl dolnika wędki: Dolnik gięty; Dolnik zakrzywiony; Dolnik odłączany; Długi dolnik gięty; Krótki dolnik gięty; Dolnik gładki (slick); Dolnik prosty; Dolnik Unibutt; Inny
sv: Typ av spöbutt: Vinklad butt; Böjd butt; Löstagbar butt; Lång vinklad butt; Kort vinklad butt; Slät butt; Rak butt; Unibutt; Övrigt
cs: Styl tupého dílu prutu: Zahnutá rukojeť; Zakřivená rukojeť; Odnímatelná rukojeť; Dlouhá zahnutá rukojeť; Krátká zahnutá rukojeť; Hladká rukojeť; Rovná rukojeť; Unibutt; Jiné
fi: Vavan perän tyyli: Taivutettu tyvi; Käyrä tyvi; Irrotettava tyvi; Pitkä taivutettu tyvi; Lyhyt taivutettu tyvi; Sileä tyvi; Suora tyvi; Unibutt-tyvi; Muu
ru: Стиль комля удилища: Изогнутый комель; Искривленный комель; Съемный комель; Длинный изогнутый комель; Короткий изогнутый комель; Гладкий комель; Прямой комель; Универсальный комель; Другое
de: Stil des Rutenendes: Gebogenes Griffteil; Gekrümmtes Griffteil; Abnehmbares Griffteil; Langes, gebogenes Griffteil; Kurzes, gebogenes Griffteil; Glattes Griffteil; Gerades Griffteil; Unibutt; Sonstige
it: Stile impugnatura canna: Calcio piegato; Calcio curvo; Calcio staccabile; Calcio piegato lungo; Calcio piegato corto; Calcio liscio; Calcio dritto; Unibutt; Altro
sl-SI: Stil zaključka ribiške palice: Upognjen ročaj; Ukrivljen ročaj; Snemljiv ročaj; Dolg upognjen ročaj; Kratek upognjen ročaj; Gladek ročaj; Raven ročaj; Unibutt; Drugo
ko: 낚싯대 버트 방식: 벤트 버트; 커브드 버트; 탈착식 버트; 롱 벤트 버트; 숏 벤트 버트; 슬릭 버트; 스트레이트 버트; 유니버트; 기타
el: Τύπος λαβής βάσης ράβδου: Κυρτή βάση; Καμπυλωτή βάση; Αποσπώμενη βάση; Μακριά κυρτή βάση; Κοντή κυρτή βάση; Λεία βάση; Ίσια βάση; Ενιαία βάση (unibutt); Άλλο
en: Rod butt style: Bent butt; Curved butt; Detachable butt; Long bent butt; Short bent butt; Slick butt; Straight butt; Unibutt; Other
hu: Botvég stílusa: Hajlított nyél; Ívelt nyél; Levehető nyél; Hosszú, hajlított nyél; Rövid, hajlított nyél; Sima nyél; Egyenes nyél; Unibutt; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štýl koncovky prúta: Ohnutá koncovka; Zakrivená koncovka; Odnímateľná koncovka; Dlhá ohnutá koncovka; Krátka ohnutá koncovka; Hladká koncovka; Rovná koncovka; Unibutt; Iné
ja: ロッドバットスタイル: ベントバット; カーブバット; 着脱式バット; ロングベントバット; ショートベントバット; スリックバット; ストレートバット; ユニバット; その他
hr-HR: Stil stražnjeg dijela štapa: Savijeni donji dio; Zakrivljeni donji dio; Odvojivi donji dio; Dugi savijeni donji dio; Kratki savijeni donji dio; Glatki donji dio; Ravni donji dio; Jednodijelni donji dio; Ostalo
fr: Type de talon de canne: Talon coudé; Talon courbé; Talon amovible; Talon long coudé; Talon court coudé; Talon lisse; Talon droit; Unibutt; Autre
vi: Kiểu cán cần câu: Cán cong; Cán uốn cong; Cán có thể tháo rời; Cán cong dài; Cán cong ngắn; Cán trơn; Cán thẳng; Unibutt; Khác
ro-RO: Stil al capătului lansetei: Mâner îndoit; Mâner curbat; Mâner detașabil; Mâner lung îndoit; Mâner scurt îndoit; Mâner neted; Mâner drept; Unibutt; Altele
pt-BR: Vara de pesca estilo do cabo: Cabo curvo; Cabo curvado; Cabo destacável; Cabo curvo longo; Cabo curvo curto; Cabo liso; Cabo reto; Unibutt; Outro
th: สไตล์ปลายคันเบ็ด: ด้ามจับแบบงอ; ด้ามจับแบบโค้ง; ด้ามจับแบบถอดได้; ด้ามจับแบบงอยาว; ด้ามจับแบบงอสั้น; ด้ามจับแบบเรียบ; ด้ามจับแบบตรง; ด้ามจับแบบ Unibutt; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo da extremidade da cana: Cabo curvado; Cabo curvo; Cabo amovível; Cabo curvado longo; Cabo curvado curto; Cabo liso; Cabo reto; Cabo unibutt; Outro
zh-CN: 鱼竿握把后段样式: 弯形竿把; 弧形竿把; 可拆卸竿把; 长弯形竿把; 短弯形竿把; 光滑竿把; 直形竿把; 一体式竿把; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на долната част на въдицата: Огъната дръжка; Извита дръжка; Разглобяема дръжка; Дълга огъната дръжка; Къса огъната дръжка; Гладка дръжка; Права дръжка; Unibutt (цяла дръжка); Други
tr: Olta dipçik stili: Kıvrık sap; Kavisli sap; Çıkarılabilir sap; Uzun eğik sap; Kısa eğik sap; Düz sap; Düz sap; Yekpare sap; Diğer
nb: Utforming av stangbutt: Bøyd bakstykke; Kurvet bakstykke; Avtakbart bakstykke; Langt bøyd bakstykke; Kort bøyd bakstykke; Glatt bakstykke; Rett bakstykke; Unibutt; Annet
lt-LT: Meškerės galo stilius: Lenkta rankenos apačia; Išlenkta rankenos apačia; Nuimama rankenos apačia; Ilga lenkta rankenos apačia; Trumpa lenkta rankenos apačia; Lygioji rankenos apačia; Tiesi rankenos apačia; Universali rankenos apačia („Unibutt“); Kita
es: Estilo de talón de la caña: Talón acodado; Talón curvo; Talón desmontable; Talón acodado largo; Talón acodado corto; Talón liso; Talón recto; Unibutt; Otro
zh-TW: 釣竿手把底座樣式: 彎型竿柄; 弧形竿柄; 可拆卸竿柄; 長彎型竿柄; 短彎型竿柄; 光滑竿柄; 直型竿柄; 一體成型竿柄; 其他